fr: Classe de qualité: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Catégorie 1; Catégorie 2; Catégorie 3; Non classé; Autre
sv: Kvalitetsklass för produkt: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Klass 1; Klass 2; Klass 3; Oklassificerad; Övrigt
ko: 농산물 등급: 엑스트라 팬시; 팬시; 1등급; 2등급; 3등급; 미분류; 기타
tr: Tarım ürünü kalite derecesi: Ekstra lüks; Lüks; 1. Sınıf; 2. Sınıf; 3. Sınıf; Sınıflandırılmamış; Diğer
pt-PT: Qualidade do produto: Qualidade extra; Qualidade superior; Classe 1; Classe 2; Classe 3; Não classificado; Outra
en: Produce grade: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Grade 1; Grade 2; Grade 3; Unclassified; Other
pt-BR: Hortifrúti classificação: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Grau 1; Grau 2; Grau 3; Não classificado; Outra
it: Grado del prodotto: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Grado 1; Grado 2; Grado 3; Non classificato; Altro
zh-CN: 农产品等级: 特级; 一级; 1 级; 2 级; 3 级; 未分类; 其他
de: Qualitätsstufe des Produkts: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Klasse 1; Klasse 2; Klasse 3; Nicht klassifiziert; Sonstige
ro-RO: Calitatea produsului: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Calitatea 1; Calitatea 2; Calitatea 3; Neclasificat; Altele
el: Κατηγορία προϊόντων: Έξτρα ποιότητα; Ανώτερη ποιότητα; Κατηγορία 1; Κατηγορία 2; Κατηγορία 3; Μη ταξινομημένο; Άλλο
th: เกรดผลผลิต: เอ็กซ์ตร้าแฟนซี; แฟนซี; เกรด 1; เกรด 2; เกรด 3; ไม่ระบุเกรด; อื่นๆ
hu: Terményminőség: Extra Fancy; Fancy; 1. osztály; 2. osztály; 3. osztály; Osztályba nem sorolt; Egyéb
pl: Klasa produktu rolnego: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Klasa 1; Klasa 2; Klasa 3; Niesklasyfikowane; Inna
fi: Kiivin laatuluokka: Extra Fancy; Fancy; 1. luokka; 2. luokka; 3. luokka; Luokittelematon; Muu
hr-HR: Kvaliteta proizvoda: Ekstra visoka klasa; Visoka klasa; 1. klasa; 2. klasa; 3. klasa; Neklasificirano; Ostalo
vi: Sản phẩm đạt tiêu chuẩn: Loại Extra Fancy; Loại Fancy; Loại 1; Loại 2; Loại 3; Chưa phân loại; Khác
zh-TW: 農產品等級: 特級; 優級; 1 級; 2 級; 3 級; 未分類; 其他
es: Grado del producto: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Grado 1; Grado 2; Grado 3; Sin clasificar; Otro
ja: 農産物グレード: エキストラファンシー; ファンシー; グレード 1; グレード 2; グレード 3; 未分類; その他
ru: Категория качества продукции: Экстра; Высший сорт; 1-й сорт; 2-й сорт; 3-й сорт; Не классифицировано; Другое
da: Produktkvalitet: Ekstra fin; Fin; Klasse 1; Klasse 2; Klasse 3; Uklassificeret; Anden
bg-BG: Клас качество на продукцията: Екстра качество (Extra Fancy); Високо качество (Fancy); Клас 1; Клас 2; Клас 3; Некласифицирано; Друго
cs: Produktová třída: Extra výběr; Výběr; Třída 1; Třída 2; Třída 3; Neklasifikováno; Ostatní
lt-LT: Produkcijos klasė: Extra Fancy; Fancy; 1 rūšis; 2 rūšis; 3 rūšis; Neklasifikuota; Kita
sk-SK: Trieda plodiny: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Akosť 1; Akosť 2; Akosť 3; Neklasifikované; Iné
nb: Produksjonsgrad: Ekstra fin; Fin; Klasse 1; Klasse 2; Klasse 3; Uklassifisert; Annet
sl-SI: Razred kmetijskih pridelkov: Izjemna kakovost (Extra Fancy); Visoka kakovost (Fancy); Kakovostni razred 1; Kakovostni razred 2; Kakovostni razred 3; Nerazvrščeno; Drugo
nl: Productkwaliteitsklasse: Extra Fancy; Fancy; Klasse 1; Klasse 2; Klasse 3; Ongeclassificeerd; Anders